North Dakota statutes. TITLE 52 Social Security
CHAPTER 52-06 Benefits
52-06-36.
Factors considered in determining suitability of work and good cause for voluntary leaving.

In determining whether or not any work is suitable for an individual and in determining the existence of good cause for voluntarily leaving the individual’s work under subsections 1 and 3 of section 52-06-02, there must be considered among other factors, and in addition to those enumerated in this section, the degree of risk involved to the individual’s health, safety, and morals, the individual’s physical fitness and prior training, the individual’s experience and prior earnings, the length of the individual’s unemployment, the individual’s prospects for obtaining work in the individual’s customary occupation, the distance of available work from the individual’s residence, and the prospects for obtaining local work. However, any work paying wages equal to the maximum weekly benefit amount must be determined suitable for an individual who has filed for and received benefit payments for eighteen consecutive weeks; provided, that consideration must be given to the degree of risk involved to the individual’s health, safety, morals, the individual’s physical fitness, and the distance of the work from the individual’s residence. No work may be deemed suitable and benefits may not be denied under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law to any otherwise eligible individual for refusing to accept new work under any of the following conditions:

If the position offered is vacant due directly to a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute.

If the wages, hours, or other conditions of work offered are substantially less favorable to the individual than those prevailing for similar work in the locality.

If, as a condition of being employed, the individual would be required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 7, subs. 1, subds. 1, 2 (a) to (c); 1941, ch. 261, § 5, subs. c, subds. 1, 2 (a) to (c); R.C. 1943, § 52-0636; S.L. 1981, ch. 506, § 1.

Collateral References.

Unemployment compensation: burden of proof as to voluntariness of separation, 73 A.L.R.4th 1093.

52-06-37.
Action for libel or slander not to be predicated upon disqualification for benefits.

No action for slander or libel, either civil or criminal, may be predicated upon information furnished by an employer to the job insurance division in connection with the imposition of any of the disqualifications set forth in section 52-06-02.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 261, § 5, subs. c, subd. 2(k1); R.C. 1943, § 52-0637; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 116.

52-06-37.1.
Applicability of decision to separate proceedings.

Any finding of fact or law, judgment, conclusion, or decision made by a claims examiner, appeals referee, the bureau, or any person with the authority to make findings of fact or law in any action or proceeding before the bureau is not conclusive or binding on, nor may it be used as evidence in, any separate or subsequent action or proceeding unrelated to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, except for workforce safety and insurance purposes, between an individual and the individual’s present or prior employer brought before an arbitrator, court, or judge of this state or the United States, regardless of whether the prior action was between the same or related parties or involved the same facts.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 540, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

52-06-38.
Penalty for making false statement or failure to disclose material fact to obtain or increase benefits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

52-06-39.
Penalty for false statement or failure to disclose material fact to prevent or reduce benefits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

52-06-40.
Penalty for violation or failure to perform duty when no penalty provided.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this title, or any order, rule, or regulation thereunder, and for which a penalty is neither prescribed in this title nor provided by any other applicable statute, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 17, subs. b; 1941, ch. 261, § 9, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 52-0640; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 565.